Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1215
Violations; penalty.

Any person, corporation, or association holding or conducting any horserace or horserace meeting in connection with which the parimutuel system of wagering is used or to be used, without a license duly issued by the commission; or any person, corporation, or association holding or conducting horseraces or horserace meetings in connection with which any wagering is permitted otherwise than in the manner specified in sections 2-1201 to 2-1218; or any person, corporation, or association violating any of the provisions of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 or any of the rules and regulations prescribed by the commission, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 15, p. 635;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1515;

R.S.1943, § 2-1215;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 13;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 9.